test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-biologia_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - biologia a-stem tavara: # Noun - full paradigm
#http://www.google.fi/url?sa=t&rct=j&q=&esrc=s&source=web&cd=1&ved=0CCAQFjAA&url=http%3A%2F%2Fwww.giella.org%2Fwp-content%2Fuploads%2F2014%2F02%2FNormitetut-koltansaamen-lainasanat-p%25C3%25B6yt%25C3%25A4kirjan-liite-1-23-5-2014-kielijaosto.xlsx&ei=JMEPVY3gJZDOaJrVgJAD&usg=AFQjCNEtCgKFa0z1U4XGHTOl7higJuFZqw&sig2=SJ7k73vBusGmY8mF2dNNxA
     biologia+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: biologia
     biologia+N+Sg+Gen+Indef: biologia
     biologia+N+Sg+Acc+Indef: biologia
     biologia+N+Sg+Ill+Indef: biologiaaʹje
     biologia+N+Sg+Loc+Indef: biologiaest
     biologia+N+Sg+Com+Indef: biologiain
     biologia+N+Ess+Indef: biologian
     biologia+N+Par+Indef: biologiad
     biologia+N+Sg+Abe+Indef: [biologiataa, biologiatää]
     biologia+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: biologia
     biologia+N+Pl+Gen+Indef: biologiai
     biologia+N+Pl+Acc+Indef: biologiaid
     biologia+N+Pl+Ill+Indef: biologiaid
     biologia+N+Pl+Loc+Indef: biologiain
     biologia+N+Pl+Com+Indef: biologiaivuiʹm
     biologia+N+Pl+Abe+Indef: [biologiaitaa, biologiaitää]
